Arkansas, session 2025, HB1710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2105, concerning the publication of a
public school's rating by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education,
is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) No school shall use or reference a public school rating of
another school that is published by the division under this subchapter in any
advertising, promotional material, or communication the school directs to the
public.
(2) As used in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, "school"
means a public school district, an open-enrollment public charter school, or
a private school.



*TNL261*
03/09/2025 9:26:28 PM TNL261